New Jersey, session 222, A1305.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    A taxpayer with gross income for the taxable year of $85,000 or less shall be allowed to deduct from gross income amounts paid by the taxpayer during the taxable year for tuition and fee expenses for the taxpayer, the taxpayer's spouse and the taxpayer's dependents as a matriculated student at a public or independent institution of higher education accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting agency or association which has been recognized by the United States Secretary of Education for the award of such status. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to taxable years commencing after the date of enactment.